Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2812
Delegated dispensing, defined.

Delegated dispensing means the practice of pharmacy by which one or more pharmacists have jointly agreed, on a voluntary basis, to work in conjunction with one or more persons pursuant to sections 38-2872 to 38-2889 under a protocol which provides that such person may perform certain dispensing functions authorized by the pharmacist or pharmacists under certain specified conditions and limitations.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 908.